District of Columbia statutes.
Repealed

2-305.07

Clauses, modifications, and fiscal responsibility.

Repealed.

Feb. 21, 1986, D.C. Law 6-85, § 507, 32 DCR 7396
Apr. 15, 1997, D.C. Law 11-259, § 101(v), 44 DCR 1423
Apr. 8, 2011, D.C. Law 18-371, § 1201(a), 58 DCR 1185

History

1981 Ed., § 1-1185.7.

Prior Codifications